Illinois, session 104th, SB869.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 10/1)  (from Ch. 8, par. 331)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Illinois Endangered Species Protection Act".9(Source: P.A. 77-2186.)